Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.140

Copy of permit to county assessor.

A copy of any permit obtained under the state building code for construction or alteration work of a total cost or fair market value in excess of five hundred dollars, shall be transmitted by the issuing authority to the county assessor of the county where the property on which the construction or alteration work is located. The building permit shall contain the county assessor's parcel number.

[ 1989 c 246 s 5.]